Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB988.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4703 of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 4703. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Cover crop." A crop for seasonal cover or other conservation purposes, such as grasses, legumes and forbs, and primarily used for erosion control, soil health improvement and water quality improvement. The term includes a cover crop managed and terminated according to United States Department of Agriculture guidelines that is not considered a crop for crop 12345678910111213141516171819 insurance purposes.* * *"Risk management agency" or "RMA." The Risk Management Agency of the United States Department of Agriculture.Section 2. Sections 4706 and 4707 of Title 3 are amended to read:§ 4706. Crop insurance financial assistance.(a) Eligibility.--The department may provide crop insurance financial assistance to eligible producers for Federal crop insurance in an amount up to 10% of the cost of the insurance premiums in years in which funds are appropriated or made available to the department. If sufficient funds are not available to provide for up to 10% of the cost of the insurance premiums, the department shall prorate the available funds among all the producers of agricultural commodities who applied for and received Federal crop insurance for that crop year.(b) Crop insurance rebate program.--The department may establish a crop insurance premium rebate program to provide rebates in the amount of $5 for each acre of a cover crop planted for crop insurance premiums paid on the acres. In providing for the crop insurance premium rebates under this subsection, the department:(1) May cooperate with RMA and may cooperate with any related Federal agency, State agency or agricultural organization.(2) May develop definitions, procedures for verification of cover crop planting, an application and process for submission after a cover crop is planted on the acres for which the person applies for a crop insurance premium rebate and award of rebates under this subsection.20250SB0988PN1136 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) May not provide a crop insurance premium rebate under this subsection for the planting of a cover crop on an acre for which funding for planting a cover crop is provided from a Federal or State grant or incentive program other than this subsection.(4) May conduct investigations as needed.(5) Shall promulgate or revise regulations, subject to the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, necessary to implement this subsection.§ 4707. Funding.(a) Use of funds.--The department is authorized to use funds specifically appropriated by the General Assembly for the purposes of this chapter and any funds, contributions or payments which may be made available to the department by another State agency, the Federal Government or any public or private source for the purpose of implementing this chapter.(b) Supplement not supplant.--The department may request supplement appropriations from the General Assembly for the purpose of providing additional funding for the crop insurance premium rebate program as necessary. Appropriated money shall not supplant any money received through any other Federal, State or other department funding source.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0988PN1136 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324